Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 7
LIQUIDATION, DISSOLUTION, AND
EMERGENCY CHARTERS

11-109-701. Discontinuance of trust business - voluntary liquidation and dissolution.

A trust company may discontinue its trust business upon furnishing to the banking board satisfactory evidence of its release and discharge from all obligations and trusts that it has undertaken or that have been imposed by law. Thereupon, the banking board shall cancel the charter, and such trust company shall not be permitted to use the word "trust" in its name or in connection with its business.

With the approval of the banking board, a trust company may liquidate and dissolve. The banking board shall grant such approval if it appears that the proposal to liquidate and dissolve has been approved by a vote of two-thirds of the outstanding voting stock of the trust company at a meeting called for that purpose and that the trust company is solvent and has sufficient liquid assets to pay off depositors and creditors immediately.

Upon approval by the banking board, the trust company shall forthwith cease to do business, shall have only the powers necessary to effect an orderly liquidation, and shall proceed to pay its depositors and creditors and to wind up its affairs.

Within thirty days after the approval, a notice of liquidation shall be sent by mail to each depositor and creditor, at the address of such person as shown in the records of the trust company. The notice shall be posted conspicuously on the premises of the trust company and shall be published in such a manner as the banking board may require. With each notice, the trust company shall send a statement of the amount shown in the records of the trust company to be the claim of the depositor or creditor. The notice shall require that claims of depositors and creditors, if the amount claimed differs from the amount stated in the notice to be due, be filed with the trust company before a specified date not earlier than sixty days thereafter, in accordance with the procedure prescribed in the notice.

The approval of an application for liquidation shall not impair any right of a depositor or creditor to payment in full, and all lawful claims of creditors and depositors shall promptly be paid.

Any assets remaining after the discharge of all obligations shall be distributed to the stockholders in accordance with their respective interests. No such distribution shall be made before all claims of depositors and creditors have been paid or any funds payable to a depositor or creditor and unclaimed have been transmitted to the banking board, or, in the case of any disputed claim, the trust company has transmitted to the banking board a sum adequate to meet any liability that may be judicially determined.

Any unclaimed distribution to a stockholder or depositor shall be held until ninety days after the final distribution and then transmitted to the banking board. Such unclaimed funds shall be held by the banking board for six years and, unless sooner claimed by the person entitled thereto, shall be transferred to the treasury of the county in which the trust company is located. The county treasurer and his successors shall hold such money in trust for a period of six years, unless the money is sooner paid out to the beneficial owner. Any money remaining in the fund six years after such money is paid into the treasury of the county, for the recovery of which no action is pending, shall be transferred to the general fund of the county, and all rights of the beneficial owners therein to recover such money shall be forever barred.

If the banking board finds that the assets will be insufficient for the full discharge of all obligations or that completion of the liquidation has been unduly delayed, the banking board may take possession and complete the liquidation in the manner provided in this article for involuntary liquidations.

The banking board may require reports of the progress of liquidation. If the banking board is satisfied that the liquidation has been properly completed, it shall cancel the charter and enter an order of dissolution.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1196, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-121 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-702. Involuntary liquidation.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, only the banking board may take possession of a trust company if, after a hearing before the banking board, it finds: The trust company's capital is inadequate; the trust company's business is being conducted in an unlawful or unsound manner; the trust company is unable to continue normal operations; or the control of the trust company has been assumed by any person or persons convicted of fraud or a felony involving moral turpitude or financial dealings in this state or any other jurisdiction, or by any partnership, association, or corporation controlled, directly or indirectly, by any person so convicted, unless the banking board determines that such person has been duly rehabilitated or otherwise that the trust company will be honestly and efficiently managed.

The banking board shall take possession of a trust company by posting upon the premises a notice reciting that it is assuming possession pursuant to this article and the time, not earlier than the posting of the notice, when its possession shall be deemed to commence. A copy of the notice shall be filed in the district court of the county in which the trust company is located. The commissioner shall notify the federal deposit insurance corporation of taking possession of any trust company that is a member of such corporation.

When the banking board has taken possession of a trust company, the commissioner shall be vested with the full and exclusive power of control, including the power to stop or to limit the payment of its obligations; to employ any necessary assistants, including legal counsel after possession of the trust company has been taken; to execute any instrument in the name of the trust company; to commence, defend, and conduct in its name any action or proceeding to which it may be a party; to terminate his or her possession by restoring the trust company to its board of directors and stockholders upon conditions prescribed by the banking board; and to reopen a closed trust company or liquidate the trust company in accordance with this article. As soon as practicable after the banking board takes possession, the commissioner shall make an inventory of the assets and file a copy thereof with the court in which the notice of possession was filed.

For six months after the posting of the notice of possession and while the banking board's possession continues, there shall be a postponement of the date upon which any period of limitation fixed by statute or agreement would otherwise expire on a claim or right of action of the trust company, or upon which a review must be taken or a pleading or other document must be filed by the trust company in any pending action or proceeding.

If, in the opinion of the banking board, an emergency exists that may result in serious losses to the customers, it may take possession of a trust company without a prior hearing. Within ten days after the banking board has taken possession, any interested person may file an application with the banking board for an order vacating such possession. The banking board shall grant the application if it finds its action was unauthorized.

For the purposes of this article, a trust company shall be deemed to be closed when the banking board has closed the trust company for business for the purpose of liquidation. The banking board shall mail notice of its intent to liquidate the trust company to the directors, stockholders, and depositors at their addresses as shown on the records of the trust company, and the commissioner shall proceed to liquidate the trust company. The banking board may appoint a liquidator to conduct the liquidation of the affairs of any trust company. The liquidator shall perform all of the duties required of the commissioner under this article and shall make such periodic reports as the banking board shall require. If the trust company is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation, the banking board may offer the position of liquidator to the federal deposit insurance corporation, which may decline in their discretion. The liquidator may employ such other assistants and legal counsel at such reasonable compensation as the liquidator shall determine to be necessary. All expenses incident to the liquidation shall be paid out of the assets of the trust company. The liquidator and any assistants shall provide a bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, running to the people of the state of Colorado, that meets with the approval of the banking board, for the faithful discharge of their duties in connection with such liquidation and the accounting for all moneys coming into their hands. The cost of such bond shall be paid from the assets of the trust company. Suit may be maintained on such bond by any person injured by a breach of the conditions thereof.

No judgment, lien, or attachment shall be executed upon any asset of the trust company while it is in the possession of the banking board. Upon the election of the commissioner, in connection with a liquidation:

Any nonconsensual lien or attachment, other than an attorney's or mechanic's lien, obtained upon any asset of the trust company during the banking board's possession, or within four months prior to commencement thereof, shall be vacated and voided, except liens created by the banking board while in possession;

Any transfer of an asset of the trust company made after or in contemplation of its insolvency, with intent to effect or that results in a preference, shall be voided.

With the approval of the court in which notice of possession has been filed, the commissioner may borrow money in the name of the trust company and may pledge its assets as security for the loan.

All necessary and reasonable expenses of the banking board's possession of a trust company and of its liquidation shall be paid from the assets thereof.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1198, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-122 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-703. Emergency grant of new charter.

In addition to powers regarding liquidation, the banking board may, in the interest of protecting the public and the depositors of a closed trust company with its principal office in this state, issue a new trust company charter to qualified individuals for the same location as the closed trust company, contingent upon the new trust company assuming full liability for such deposits of the closed trust company as may be transferred to it. Under such conditions, a new charter may be issued summarily without the publication of notice, without the holding of a public hearing, and without complying with any of the other provisions and procedures specified in this article.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1199, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-122.1 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-704. Liquidation by commissioner - procedure.

In liquidating a trust company, the commissioner may exercise any power of the trust company and shall have the duty to collect all assets, debts, and claims belonging to the trust company. Unless the commissioner obtains the approval of the court in which notice of possession has been filed by petition setting forth the material facts and upon such notice to the officers, directors, or stockholders in such form as the court may require, the commissioner shall not:

Sell any asset of the trust company having a value in excess of five hundred dollars;

Compromise or release any claim if the amount of the claim exceeds five hundred dollars, exclusive of interest;

Make any payment on any claim, other than a claim upon an obligation incurred by the commissioner, before preparing and filing a schedule of his or her determinations in accordance with this article.

Within six months after the commencement of liquidation, the commissioner may, by election, terminate any executory contract for services or advertising to which the trust company is a party or any obligation of the trust company as a lessee. A lessor who receives at least sixty days' notice of the commissioner's election to terminate the lease shall have no claim for rent, other than rent accrued to the date of termination, nor for damages for such termination.

The right of any agency of the United States insuring savings obligations to be subrogated to the rights of depositors upon payment of their claims shall not be less extensive than the law of the United States requires as a condition of the authority to issue such insurance or make such payments to depositors of trust companies.

As soon after the commencement of liquidation as is practicable, the commissioner shall send notice of the liquidation to each known depositor, creditor, and bailor of property held by the trust company at the address shown in the records of the trust company. The notice shall also be published once a week for three successive weeks, in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county in which the trust company is located. With each notice, the commissioner shall send a statement of the amount shown in the records of the trust company to be the claim of the depositor, creditor, or bailor. The notice shall demand that property held by the trust company as bailee be withdrawn by the person entitled thereto and the claim of a depositor or creditor, if the amount claimed differs from the amount stated in the notice to be due, be filed with the commissioner before a specified date, not earlier than sixty days thereafter, in accordance with the procedure prescribed in the notice.

Any unclaimed property, including the contents of safe deposit boxes, held by the trust company as bailee and certified inventories thereof shall be held by the commissioner for six years unless sooner claimed by the person entitled to such property. After six years the commissioner may sell or otherwise appropriately dispose of the property. The proceeds of a sale shall be transferred and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of subsection (10) of this section.

Within six months after the last day specified in the notice for the filing of claims, or within such longer period as may be allowed by the court in which notice of possession has been filed, the commissioner shall:

Reject any claim if the commissioner determines the invalidity thereof;

Determine the amount, if any, owing to each known creditor or depositor and the priority class of such claim under this article;

Prepare a schedule of the commissioner's determinations for filing in the court in which notice of possession was filed;

Notify each person whose claim has not been allowed in full and publish once a week for three successive weeks, in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county in which the trust company is located, a notice of the time when and the place where the schedule of determinations will be available for inspection and the date, not sooner than thirty days thereafter, when the commissioner will file the schedule in court. If there is no newspaper of general circulation in such city or county, then publication shall be in the newspaper of general circulation published nearest thereto.

Within twenty days after the filing of the commissioner's schedule, the federal deposit insurance corporation or any creditor, depositor, or stockholder may file an objection to any determination made that adversely affects or may adversely affect such objector. Any objections so filed shall be heard and determined by the court upon such notice to the commissioner and interested claimants as the court may prescribe. If the objection is sustained, the court shall direct an appropriate modification of the schedule. After filing the schedule, the commissioner may, from time to time, make partial distribution to the holders of claims that are undisputed or have been allowed by the court if a proper reserve is established for the payment of disputed claims. As soon as is practicable after the determination of all objections, the commissioner shall make final distribution.

The following claims shall have priority in the order specified: Obligations incurred by the commissioner; wages and salaries of officers and employees earned during the three-month period preceding the commissioner's possession in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars for any one person; fees and assessments due to the commissioner; amounts that the federal deposit insurance corporation are entitled to receive on account of their subrogation to the claims of depositors; all other claims for savings obligations; claims of secured creditors to the extent of the value of their collateral; and all other claims.

After the payment of all other claims, the commissioner shall pay claims otherwise proper that were not filed within the time prescribed. If the sum available for any class is insufficient to provide payment in full, such sum shall be distributed to the claimants in the class pro rata.

Any assets remaining after all claims have been paid shall be distributed to the stockholders in accordance with their respective interests.

Unclaimed funds remaining after final distribution has been made by the commissioner shall be retained for six years by the commissioner unless sooner claimed by the owner. At the expiration of such period, the remaining sum shall be transferred to the treasury of the county in which the trust company is located. The county treasurer and his or her successors shall hold such money in trust for a period of six years, unless the money is sooner paid out to the beneficial owner or owners or a suit is instituted to recover such money or a portion thereof. Any money remaining in the fund six years after such money is paid into the treasury of the county, for the recovery of which no action is pending, shall be transferred to the general fund of the county, and all rights of the former beneficial owners of such money to recover the money shall be forever barred.

When the final distribution of the proceeds of liquidation has been made in accordance with this article, the commissioner shall file an account with the court in which notice of possession was filed. Upon approval thereof, the commissioner shall be relieved of liability in connection with the liquidation and shall cancel the charter.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1200, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-124 as it existed prior to 2003.